Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5974.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 12-25-20 of the General Laws in Chapter 12-25 entitled "Criminal
Injuries Compensation" is hereby amended to read as follows:
12-25-20. Offenses to which chapter applies.
The office may award compensation in accordance with the provisions of this chapter for
personal injury or death which resulted from offenses in the following categories:
(1) Assault with intent to commit murder, robbery, or rape;
(2) Assault with a dangerous weapon;
(3) Assault and battery;
(4) Mayhem;
(5) Indecent assault and battery on a child under thirteen (13) years of age;
(6) Arson or statutory burning;
(7) Kidnapping;
(8) Robbery or larceny from that person;
(9) Murder;
(10) Manslaughter;
(11) First or second degree sexual assault;
(12) Child molestation, first or second degree;
(13) The abominable and detestable crime against nature or assault with intent to commit
the abominable and detestable crime against nature;

(14) Driving under the influence of alcohol or drugs;
(15) Refusal by a driver to submit to a chemical test for alcohol or drugs in the immediate
aftermath of a collision;
(16) Driving so as to endanger, resulting in death, pursuant to § 31-27-1;
(17) Driving so as to endanger, resulting in personal injury, pursuant to § 31-27-1.1;
(18) Any other crime excluding motor vehicle offenses other than those enumerated in this
section which results in personal injury or death; and
(19) Failure to stop by a driver in circumstances which result in the serious bodily injury
or the death of any person, pursuant to § 31-26-1.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001702
========
LC001702 - Page 2 of 3